Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.025

Application of chapter to education providers under chapter 28A.193 RCW.

This chapter applies to the bargaining unit of classified employees of school districts, educational service districts, or institutions of higher education that are education providers under chapter 28A.193 RCW. Such bargaining units must be limited to the employees working as education providers to juveniles in each adult correctional facility maintained by the department of corrections and must be separate from other bargaining units in school districts, educational service districts, or institutions of higher education.

[ 1998 c 244 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 244: See RCW 28A.193.900.